Wisconsin, session 2025, SB212.
do enact as follows:SB212,13Section 1. 5.64 (2) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:SB212,2,1245.64 (2) (am) There shall be a separate ballot when any proposed 1constitutional amendment or any other measure or question is submitted to a vote 2of the people, except as authorized in s. 5.655. The ballot shall give a concise 3statement of each question in accordance with the act or resolution directing 4submission in the same form as prescribed by the commission under s. 7.08 (1) (a). 5The question may not be worded in such a manner as to require a negative vote to 6approve a proposition or an affirmative vote to disapprove a proposition. The 7question shall be in plain language. For a proposed constitutional amendment, the 8question shall clearly indicate whether any part of the constitutional amendment is 9contained in the statutes in effect as of the date of final passage of the joint 10resolution directing that the question be submitted to a vote of the people. Unless 11otherwise expressly provided, this ballot form shall be used at all elections when 12questions are submitted to a vote of the people.SB212,2,1313